Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.83.020

Money laundering.

(1) A person is guilty of money laundering when that person conducts or attempts to conduct a financial transaction involving the proceeds of specified unlawful activity and:

(a) Knows the property is proceeds of specified unlawful activity; or

(b) Knows that the transaction is designed in whole or in part to conceal or disguise the nature, location, source, ownership, or control of the proceeds, and acts recklessly as to whether the property is proceeds of specified unlawful activity; or

(c) Knows that the transaction is designed in whole or in part to avoid a transaction reporting requirement under federal law.

(2) In consideration of the constitutional right to counsel afforded by the Fifth and Sixth amendments to the United States Constitution and Article 1, Section 22 of the Constitution of Washington, an additional proof requirement is imposed when a case involves a licensed attorney who accepts a fee for representing a client in an actual criminal investigation or proceeding. In these situations, the prosecution is required to prove that the attorney accepted proceeds of specified unlawful activity with intent:

(a) To conceal or disguise the nature, location, source, ownership, or control of the proceeds, knowing the property is proceeds of specified unlawful activity; or

(b) To avoid a transaction reporting requirement under federal law.

The proof required by this subsection is in addition to the requirements contained in subsection (1) of this section.

(3) An additional proof requirement is imposed when a case involves a financial institution and one or more of its employees. In these situations, the prosecution is required to prove that proceeds of specified unlawful activity were accepted with intent:

(a) To conceal or disguised [disguise] the nature, location, source, ownership, or control of the proceeds, knowing the property is proceeds of specified unlawful activity; or

(b) To avoid a transaction reporting requirement under federal law.

The proof required by this subsection is in addition to the requirements contained in subsection (1) of this section.

(4) Money laundering is a class B felony.

(5) A person who violates this section is also liable for a civil penalty of twice the value of the proceeds involved in the financial transaction and for the costs of the suit, including reasonable investigative and attorneys' fees.

(6) Proceedings under this chapter shall be in addition to any other criminal penalties, civil penalties, or forfeitures authorized under state law.

[ 1992 c 210 s 2.]